District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-301.21

Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20b
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2602(c), 49 DCR 6968
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 89, 51 DCR 881
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6042(a), 51 DCR 8441
2001 Ed., §  50-321.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 6042(a) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) reversion of funds in the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund, see § 6042(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 6042(a) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) reversion of funds in the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund, see § 6042(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
Short title of subtitle E of Law 15-205: Section 6041 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle E of the act may be cited as the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission Fund Repealer Amendment Act of 2004.
Section 6042(c) of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “All funds in the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund shall revert to the General Fund on October 1, 2004.”